Maine, session 132, LD244.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 34-A MRSA §3053 is enacted to read:
§3053. Transitional housing program and fund
1. Transitional housing program. The department, in collaboration with the Maine
State Housing Authority, shall administer a program to provide transitional housing to an
indigent client for the first 2 months after the client's release from a correctional facility.
Criteria for housing under this section include that:
A. The housing is maintained in a safe, sanitary manner and meets all state and local
building codes under Title 10, chapter 1103 and fire and life safety codes under Title
25, section 2452 for the type of building in which the transitional housing is located;
B. The former client has a bed and adequate bedroom and living space and the housing
has private toilet and bathing facilities and adequate dining and kitchen facilities for
the number of residents in the unit or building; and
C. Adequate provisions have been made for a former client convicted of a sex offense
under Title 17-A, chapters 11 and 12 and to meet all requirements and restrictions for
sex offenders under chapters 15 and 17.
2. Transitional housing fund. The transitional housing fund is established. The fund
is administered by the department. The purpose of the fund is to support transitional
housing for recently released clients of a correctional facility under subsection 1. The fund
receives money from appropriations, allocations, donations, grants and other public and
private funding sources. The department may invest money in the fund, and interest earned
by the fund is credited to the fund. The fund may not lapse but must be carried forward to
the next fiscal year.
Sec. 2. Maine State Housing Authority to study long-term solutions for
transitional housing for recently released indigent clients of Department of
Corrections. The Maine State Housing Authority, in collaboration with the Department
of Corrections, shall study long-term solutions for transitional housing for recently released
indigent clients of the Department of Corrections. By December 3, 2025, the Maine State
Housing Authority shall submit a report on the conclusions of the study, along with any
recommended legislation, to the Joint Standing Committee on Housing and Economic
Development. The joint standing committee may report out legislation based upon the
report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.